Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 30.3 Tuition for Covered Individuals Under Post-911 GI Bill and Montgomery GI Bill

30-30.3-1.
In-state tuition eligibility.

Pursuant to the reauthorization of the Federal Higher Education Act of 2008 and passage of the Veterans Access, Choice, and Accountability Act of 2014, the following individuals shall be entitled to pay tuition and fees at an institution of higher education at the rates provided for Rhode Island residents without regard to the length of time the person has lived in this state:

Any active duty member or the spouse or dependent of an active duty member of any branch of the uniformed services who has been on active duty for a period of more than thirty (30) days; or

Any active duty member who is injured while on active duty, and whose injuries causes him or her to be on active duty for a period of less than thirty (30) days; or

Any veteran of the uniformed services who is eligible for Federal GI Bill educational benefits; or

Any other individual who is eligible for transferred Federal GI Bill educational benefits or the Fry Scholarship, provided that he or she lives in the state of Rhode Island while attending a Rhode Island public postsecondary institution.

The council of postsecondary education shall develop a policy and rules and regulations to ensure that public postsecondary institutions in this state implement the changes set forth in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 197, § 1.